Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1133.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-311, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-311. Nomination papers; statement of interest; filing; definitions A. Any person desiring to become a candidate at a primary election for a political party and to have the person's name printed on the official ballot shall be a qualified elector of the party and, not less than one hundred twenty nor more than one hundred fifty days before the primary election, shall sign and cause to be filed a nomination paper giving the person's actual residence address or, if the person does not have an actual residence address, a description of place of residence and post office address, or, if the person's actual residence address is protected pursuant to section 16-153, a post office box or private mailbox address in the candidate's district or precinct, as applicable for a district or precinct office, naming the party of which the person desires to become a candidate, stating the office and district or precinct, if any, for which the person offers the person's candidacy, stating the exact manner in which the person desires to have the person's name printed on the official ballot pursuant to subsection G of this section, and giving the date of the primary election and, if nominated, the date of the general election at which the person desires to become a candidate.  Except for a candidate for United States senator or representative in Congress, a candidate for public office shall be a qualified elector at the time of filing and shall reside in the county, district or precinct that the person proposes to represent.  A candidate for partisan public office shall be continuously registered with the political party of which the person desires to be a candidate beginning no not later than the date of the first petition signature on the candidate's petition through the date of the general election at which the person is a candidate. B. Any person desiring to become a candidate at any nonpartisan election and to have the person's name printed on the official ballot shall be at the time of filing a qualified elector of the county, city, town or district and, not less than one hundred twenty nor more than one hundred fifty days before the election, shall sign and cause to be filed a nomination paper giving the person's actual residence address or, if the person does not have an actual residence address, a description of place of residence and post office address, or, if the person's actual residence address is protected pursuant to section 16-153, a post office box or private mailbox address in the candidate's county, city, town or district and ward or precinct, as applicable for a county, city, town or district and ward or precinct office, stating the office and county, city, town or district and ward or precinct, if any, for which the person offers the person's candidacy, stating the exact manner in which the person desires to have the person's name printed on the official ballot pursuant to subsection G of this section and giving the date of the election. A candidate for office shall reside at the time of filing in the county, city, town, district, ward or precinct that the person proposes to represent. C. Notwithstanding subsection B of this section, any city or town may adopt by ordinance for its elections the time frame provided in subsection A of this section for filing nomination petitions. The ordinance shall be adopted not less than one hundred fifty days before the first election to which it applies. D. All persons desiring to become a candidate shall file with the nomination paper provided for in subsection A of this section a declaration, which shall be printed in a form prescribed by the secretary of state. The declaration shall include facts sufficient to show that, other than the residency requirement provided in subsection A of this section and the satisfaction of any monetary penalties, fines or judgments as prescribed in subsection J of this section, the candidate will be qualified at the time of election to hold the office the person seeks, and that for any monetary penalties, fines or judgments as prescribed in subsection J of this section, the candidate has made complete payment before the time of filing. E. The nomination paper of a candidate for the office of United States senator or representative in Congress, for the office of presidential elector or for a state office, including a member of the legislature, or for any other office for which the electors of the entire state or a subdivision of the state greater than a county are entitled to vote, shall be filed with the secretary of state no not later than 5:00 p.m. on the last date for filing. F. The nomination paper of a candidate for superior court judge or for a county, district and precinct office for which the electors of a county or a subdivision of a county other than an incorporated city or town are entitled to vote shall be filed with the county elections officer no not later than 5:00 p.m. on the last date for filing as prescribed by subsection A of this section. The nomination paper of a candidate for a city or town office shall be filed with the city or town clerk no not later than 5:00 p.m. on the last date for filing. The nomination paper of a candidate for school district office shall be filed with the county school superintendent no not later than 5:00 p.m. on the last date for filing. G. The nomination paper shall include the exact manner in which the candidate desires to have the person's name printed on the official ballot and shall be limited to the candidate's surname and given name or names, an abbreviated version of such names or appropriate initials such as "Bob" for "Robert", "Jim" for "James", "Wm." for "William" or "S." for "Samuel".  Nicknames are permissible, but nicknames, abbreviated versions or initials of given names may not suggest reference to professional, fraternal, religious or military titles and may not include a slogan, a promotional word or phrase or any word that does not actually constitute a nickname. No other descriptive name or names shall be printed on the official ballot, except as provided in this section. Candidates' abbreviated names or nicknames may be printed within quotation marks. The candidate's surname shall be printed first, followed by the given name or names. H. Not later than the date of the first petition signature on a nomination petition, a person who may be a candidate for office pursuant to this section shall file a statement of interest with the appropriate filing officer for that office.  The statement of interest shall contain the name of the person, the political party, if any, and the name of the office that may be sought. Any nomination petition signatures collected before the date the statement of interest is filed are invalid and subject to challenge.  This subsection does not apply to: 1. Candidates for elected office for special taxing districts that are established pursuant to title 48. 2. Candidates for precinct committeeman. 3. Candidates for president or vice president of the United States. I. A person who does not file a timely nomination paper that complies with this section is not eligible to have the person's name printed on the official ballot for that office.  The filing officer shall not accept the nomination paper of a candidate for state or local office unless the person provides or has provided all of the following: 1. The financial disclosure statement as prescribed for candidates for that office. Beginning on the effective date of this amendment to this section, A statewide or legislative candidate who has filed a financial disclosure statement for that year pursuant to section 18-444 for public officers as defined in section 38-541 is deemed to have complied with this paragraph and an additional filing is not required for that year. Beginning on January 1, 2027, for all other offices, a candidate who has filed a financial DISCLOSURE statement for that year pursuant to section 18-444 for public officers as defined in section 38-541 is deemed to have complied with this paragraph and an additional filing is not required for that year. 2. The declaration of qualification and eligibility as prescribed in subsection D of this section. J. Except in cases where the liability is being appealed, the filing officer shall not accept the nomination paper of a candidate for state or local office if the person is liable for an aggregation of $1,000 or more in fines, penalties, late fees or administrative or civil judgments, including any interest or costs, in any combination, that have not been fully satisfied at the time of the attempted filing of the nomination paper and the liability arose from failure to comply with or enforcement of chapter 6 of this title. K. For the purposes of this title: 1. "Election district" means this state, any county, city, town, precinct or other political subdivision or a special district that is not a political subdivision, that is authorized by statute to conduct an election and that is authorized or required to conduct its election in accordance with this title. 2. "Nomination paper" means the form filed with the appropriate office by a person wishing to declare the person's intent to become a candidate for a particular political office. END_STATUTE (ENACTED WITHOUT THE EMERGENCY) Sec. 2. Emergency This act is an emergency measure that is necessary to preserve the public peace, health or safety and is operative immediately as provided by law. APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.